Nebraska, session 109, LB442.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB442 LB442
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) The Department of Health and Human Services shall
administer a program of social services in this state. The department may
contract with other social agencies for the purchase of social services
at rates not to exceed those prevailing in the state or the cost at which
the department could provide those services. The statutory maximum
payments for the separate program of aid to dependent children shall
apply only to public assistance grants and shall not apply to payments
for social services.
(2)(a) As part of the provision of social services authorized by
section 68-1202, the department shall provide child care assistance to
families with incomes from one hundred and thirty percent up to four
hundred percent of the federal poverty level, on and after October 1,
2026.
(b)(i) A child care provider seeking to participate in the state
child care subsidy program shall comply with the criminal history record
information check requirements of the Child Care Licensing Act. In
determining ongoing eligibility for this program, ten percent of a
household's gross earned income shall be disregarded after twelve
continuous months on the program and at each subsequent redetermination.
In determining ongoing eligibility, the amount of such child care
assistance shall be based on a cost-shared plan between the recipient
family and the state and shall be based on a sliding-scale methodology. A
recipient family may be required to contribute a percentage of such
family's gross income for child care that is no more than the cost-
sharing rates in the transitional child care assistance program as of
January 1, 2025, for those no longer eligible for cash assistance as
provided in section 68-1724.
(ii) Beginning October 1, 2025, a licensed child care program that
employs a member of an eligible household shall make reasonable
accommodations so that the eligible applicant or adult household member
is not a primary caregiver to such applicant's or adult household
-2-

LB442 LB442
2025 2025
member's child. If reasonable accommodation cannot be made, the
department shall allow the applicant or adult household member to receive
child care assistance for the applicant's or adult household member's
child including when the applicant or adult household member is the
primary caregiver for such child.
(iii) Beginning October 1, 2025, a licensed child care provider
eligible for the child care subsidy may enroll the household member's
child in a child care program other than the household member's child
care program to receive child care assistance.
(iv) The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations
consistent with subdivision (b) of this subsection.
(c) A payroll tax of fifty-two-hundredths of one percent shall be
used to fund the program with a payment ratio for employer to employee,
respectively, of thirty-nine-hundredths of one percent to thirteen-
hundredths of one percent. General Funds shall not be used to pay the
costs to the state, including administration costs, resulting from the
income eligibility changes made in subdivisions (2)(a) and (b) of this
section, for the period beginning October 1, 2026.
(3) In determining the rate or rates to be paid by the department
for child care as defined in section 43-2605, the department shall adopt
a fixed-rate schedule for the state or a fixed-rate schedule for an area
of the state applicable to each child care program category of provider
as defined in section 71-1910 which may claim reimbursement for services
provided by the federal Child Care Subsidy program, except that the
department shall not pay a rate higher than that charged by an individual
provider to that provider's private clients. The schedule may provide
separate rates for care for infants, for children with special needs,
including disabilities or technological dependence, or for other
individual categories of children. The schedule shall be effective on
October 1 of every year and shall be revised annually by the department.
(4) The state child care subsidy program shall also provide the
-3-

LB442 LB442
2025 2025
highest level of child care assistance to qualified apprentice workers.
For purposes of this subsection, qualified apprentice means an individual
who is (a) represented by an organization described in section 501(c)(5)
of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, and (b) employed by a redeveloper,
contractor, or subcontractor participating in a registered apprenticeship
program, as defined in 26 U.S.C. 3131(e)(3)(B), if the training facility
of such program is located in Nebraska.
-4-